trunk/incubator/apertium-es-ast.ast.dix
    <pardef n="llob/u__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>u</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>os</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>u<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="avi/ón__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ones</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ón</l>
          <r>ón<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="redactor__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="crisis__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="at/ún__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ún</l>
          <r>ún<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>unes</l>
          <r>ún<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ablan/éu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>éu</l>
          <r>éu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eos</l>
          <r>éu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dependient/e__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>e</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>e<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="an/ís__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ís</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ises</l>
          <r>ís<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="abog/áu__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áu</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ada</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aos</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aes</l>
          <r>áu<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="autob/ús__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>uses</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ús</l>
          <r>ús<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="paresq">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="lpar"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="mes__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alde/a__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>a</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>es</l>
          <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ciud/á__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aes</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>á</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aes</l>
          <r>á<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="adi/ós__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>oses</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ós</l>
          <r>ós<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="alfére/z__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>z</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ces</l>
          <r>z<s n="n"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="atardec/ida__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ida</l>
          <r>ida<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>íes</l>
          <r>ida<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="aboques__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="iverna/da__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>aes</l>
          <r>da<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
	<pardef n="im/axe__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>axe</l>
          <r>axe<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>áxenes</l>
          <r>axe<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ag/ua__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ua</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ües</l>
          <r>ua<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!-- Prepositions -->
    <pardef n="según__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/con__pr">
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>con</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e r="RL">
        <p>
          <l><a/>con</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>col</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>cola</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>colo</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>colos</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>coles</l>
          <r>con<s n="pr"/><j/>el<s n="det"/><s n="def"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="con"><i/><par n="/con__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="baxo"><i>baxo</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="contra"><i>contra</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ente"><i>ente</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="según"><i>según</i><par n="según__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ciudá"><i>ciud</i><par n="ciud/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imaxe"><i>imaxe</i><par n="im/axe__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llibertá"><i>llibert</i><par n="ciud/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="llingua"><i>lling</i><par n="ag/ua__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agua"><i>ag</i><par n="ag/ua__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ciudá"><i>ciud</i><par n="ciud/á__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aboques"><i>aboques</i><par n="aboques__n"/></e>
    <e lm="abriespa"><i>abriesp</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acarréu"><i>acarr</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="acordión"><i>acordi</i><par n="avi/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="adiós"><i>adi</i><par n="adi/ós__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aféresis"><i>aféresis</i><par n="crisis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afiáu"><i>afi</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aficionáu"><i>aficion</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="afinador"><i>afinador</i><par n="redactor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agrupación"><i>agrupaci</i><par n="avi/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aguacil"><i>aguacil</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aguantadera"><i>aguantader</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aguiyonada"><i>aguiyona</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="albarderu"><i>albarder</i><par n="llob/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alcaldada"><i>alcalda</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alférez"><i>alfére</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alministrador"><i>alministrador</i><par n="redactor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alpargateru"><i>alpargater</i><par n="llob/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="alquiler"><i>alquiler</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="analísís"><i>analís</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e lm="androcéu"><i>androc</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anís"><i>an</i><par n="an/ís__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anorexa"><i>anorex</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antepasáu"><i>antepas</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antifonal"><i>antifonal</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="antífasis"><i>antífasis</i><par n="crisis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apendicitis"><i>apendicitis</i><par n="crisis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apertador"><i>apertador</i><par n="redactor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aportelláu"><i>aportell</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="apoxéu"><i>apox</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aprendiz"><i>aprendi</i><par n="alfére/z__n"/></e>
    <e lm="archivador"><i>archivador</i><par n="redactor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="archiveru"><i>archiver</i><par n="llob/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arencón"><i>arenc</i><par n="avi/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arquiteutu"><i>arquiteut</i><par n="llob/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arracada"><i>arraca</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arribax"><i>arribax</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="arrodéu"><i>arrod</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="artritis"><i>artritis</i><par n="crisis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ascendendia"><i>ascendendi</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ascesis"><i>ascesis</i><par n="crisis__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atestáu"><i>atest</i><par n="abog/áu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atizador"><i>atizador</i><par n="redactor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atracón"><i>atrac</i><par n="avi/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="atún"><i>at</i><par n="at/ún__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aullida"><i>aull</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e lm="autobús"><i>autob</i><par n="autob/ús__n"/></e>
    <e lm="aviador"><i>aviador</i><par n="redactor__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ayudante"><i>ayudant</i><par n="dependient/e__n"/></e>
    <e lm="azada"><i>aza</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="balconada"><i>balcona</i><par n="iverna/da__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ballesteru"><i>ballester</i><par n="llob/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bamboléu"><i>bambol</i><par n="ablan/éu__n"/></e>
    <e lm="baranzal"><i>baranzal</i><par n="mes__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barbeta"><i>barbet</i><par n="alde/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="barbón"><i>barb</i><par n="avi/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bastida"><i>bast</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batallón"><i>batall</i><par n="avi/ón__n"/></e>
    <e lm="batida"><i>bat</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bebida"><i>beb</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e lm="benitu"><i>benit</i><par n="llob/u__n"/></e>
    <e lm="berrida"><i>berr</i><par n="atardec/ida__n"/></e>
    <e lm="betún"><i>bet</i><par n="at/ún__n"/></e>
    <e lm="d'"><p><l>d'</l><r>de</r></p><par n="según__pr"/></e>
